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DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINE

DI1LQ-17

DTC P0325/52 | Knock Sensor 1 Circuit(Bank 1 orSingle
Sensor)
DTC P0330/55 | Knock Sensor 2 Circuit (Bank 2)
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

Each knock sensor is fitted to the right bank and left bank of the cylinder block to detect engine knocking.
This sensor contains a piezoelectric element which generates a voltage when it becomes deformed. The
piezoelectric element sends a signal to the engine control ECU, when the cylinder block vibrates due to
knocking. If engine knocking occurs, ignition timing is retarded to suppress it.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
Outputvoltage oftheknocksensor 1 decreasesbeyonda ¢ Openorshortinknocksensor 1 circuit
P0325/52 threshold (threshold varies according to an engine speed) with *Knocksensor 1 (looseness)
engine speed 2,000 rpmto 5,000 rpm ( 1 trip detectionlogic) * Engine control ECU
Output voltage ofthe knock sensor 2 decreases beyond a ¢ Openorshortinknock sensor 2 circuit
P0330/55 threshold (threshold varies according to an engine speed) with ¢ Knock sensor 2 (looseness)
engine speed 2,000 rpmto 5,000 rpm ( 1 trip detectionlogic) « Engine control ECU
HINT:
. Bank 1 referstothe bankthatincludes cylinder No. 1.
. Bank 2refersthe the bank thatdoes notinclude cylinder No. 1.
] Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE
KNK Signal Waveform +  Withtheengineracing (4,000 rpm), check the waveform
0.5V betweenterminals KNK 1 and KNK2 ofthe engine control
Division 1 ECU connector and body ground.
HINT:
ov The correct waveform is as shown.
. Spreadthetime onthe horizontal axis, and confirmthat
periodofthewaveis0. 13 msec. (Normalmode vibration
5 msec./Division frequency ofknocksensor:8. 1 kHz)
HINT:
Ifnormal mode vibration frequency is not 8. 1 kHz,the sensor
OD.it\_’/i\s/i/on has malfunction.
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MONITOR DESCRIPTION

The knock sensor located on the cylinder block, detects spark knock.

When spark knock occurs,the sensorpick  —upvibratesin aspecificfrequency range. Whenthe engine con-
trol ECU detects the voltage in this frequency range, it retards the ignition timing to suppress the spark knock.
The engine control ECU also senses background engine noise with the knock sensor and uses this noise
tocheckforfaultsinthe sensor. Ifthe knock sensor signallevelis too low for more than 10sec.,andifthe
knock sensor output voltage is out of normal range, the engine control ECU interprets this as a fault in the
knock sensor and sets a DTC.

This monitor run after engine is warmed up (Engine Coolant Temperature (ECT) is 60 °Cormore) andthe
vehicle isdriven over 40 km/h for 1 minutes.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:

. DTCPO0325isforthebank 1 knocksensor circuit.

. DTC P0330is forthe bank 2 knock sensor circuit.

. Readfreezeframedatausingthehand  -heldtester. Freeze frame datarecordsthe engine conditions
when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the
vehicle was running or stopped, ifthe engine was warmed up or not, ifthe air —fuelratiowasleanor
rich, as well as other data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

1 Connecthand -held tester,and check knock sensor circuit.

PREPARATION:
(@) Connecthand -heldtestertothe DLCS.
(b) Disconnectthe EC 1 connector.

Engine Control ECU

ECH : ;
Knock Sensor 1 (c) Connectthe terminals ofthe disconnectedEC 1 male con-
@ 1 2 2 @26 KNK1 nectorandEC 1 female asfollows.
h Male connector <> Female connector
Knock Sens‘lor 2 2 Terminal2 <> Terminal3
_‘1__'_@_; 3 3 —— () KNK2 Terminal3 <> Terminal2
Male Female (d) Turnignition switch ON and push the hand -heldtester

Connector Connector\____J - .
main switch ON.

(e) After the engine is warmed up, perform quick racing to

EC1 4,000 rpm 3 times.
I I CHECK:
Check the DTC.
RESULT:
Tvoe | DTC same as when vehicle brought in
e
P P0325 — P03250rP0330 — P0330
Fl
ﬁéogé)g A19885 T " DTC different to when vehicle brought in
ype P0325 — P03300rP0330 — P0325

Type> Go to step 3.
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2 [ Check for open and short in harness and connector between EC1 connector and
engine control ECU (See page IN-20).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI-74).

3 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between EC1 connector and
knock sensor (See page IN-20).

HINT:
. IfDTC P0325 has changedto P0330, check the knock sensor circuit onthe bank 1 side.
. IfDTC P0330 has changedto P0325, check the knock sensor circuit onthe bank 2 side.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

Replace knock sensor.
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